Illinois, session 104th, HB4210.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 82025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 18Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 19operating, or promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   HB4210- 2 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 2support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 3services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 4music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 5orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 6organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 7and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 8effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 9otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 10purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 11by the Department.12    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 13property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 14society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 15operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 16purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 18no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 19operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 20age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 21exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 22company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 23purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 24otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 25purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 26number issued by the Department.  HB4210- 3 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 2replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 3the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.4    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 9arts production, and including machinery and equipment 10purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 11acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 12acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 13a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 14arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 15and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 16paragraph (18). 17    (7) Farm chemicals.18    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 19coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 20United States of America, or the government of any foreign 21country, and bullion.22    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 23student organization affiliated with an elementary or 24secondary school located in Illinois.25    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 26as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax   HB4210- 4 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1Act.2    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 4purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 5State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 6replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 8implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 10chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 11to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 13registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 14polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 15overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 16equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 17tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 18motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 19on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 20of the tender is separately stated.21    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 22farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 23installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 24limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 25or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 26limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors,   HB4210- 5 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 2such equipment.3    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 4sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 5computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 6facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 7to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 8crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 9agricultural chemicals. 10    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 11also includes electrical power generation equipment used 12primarily for production agriculture. 13    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-90.15    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 17to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 18conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 19destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 20the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 21domestic stopovers.22    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 24used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 25its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 26engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the   HB4210- 6 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 2at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 3origination to the city of final destination on the same 4aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 5that aircraft. 6    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 8food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 9extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 10turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 11employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 12hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 13respect to which the service charge is imposed.14    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 15and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 16rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 17pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 18(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 19lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 20exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 21machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 22motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 23Vehicle Code.24    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 25repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 26that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser   HB4210- 7 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 2photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.3    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 4mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 5reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 6equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 7excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 9Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 10for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 11(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 12during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 14    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 16retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 17production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 18as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 19use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.20    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 21used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 22tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 23lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 24manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 25used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 26person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as   HB4210- 8 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 2of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 3other similar items of no commercial value on special order 4for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 5paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 6property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 7July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 8does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 9generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 10the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 11wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 12through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 13water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 15of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 16meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 172017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 18but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 19as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 20    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 21purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 22that personal property was received by a florist located 23outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 24deliver the personal property.25    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  HB4210- 9 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 11beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 12    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 13any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 14analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 15lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 16longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 17otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 21in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 22in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 23the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 24the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 25at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 26collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated)   HB4210- 10 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 2this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 3tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 4collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 5have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 6lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 7for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 8Department.9    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 10the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 12the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 13been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 14number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 16does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 17non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 18imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB4210- 11 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 7for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 8disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 9manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 10corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 11that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 12number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 13who reside within the declared disaster area.14    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 17the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 18including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 19access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 20water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 21purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 22facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 23State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 24Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 25in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 26disaster.  HB4210- 12 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 2at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 3used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-90.5    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 61-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution that is determined by the 9Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 10educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 11corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 12foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 13for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 14schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 15useful branches of learning by methods common to public 16schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 17intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 18schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 19organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 20study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 21individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 22technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 23occupation.24    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 25including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 26benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school,   HB4210- 13 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 2the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 3district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 4parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 5does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 6private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 7entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 8another individual or entity that sold the property for the 9purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 10from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 132001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 14serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 15other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 16Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 17and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 18amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 19paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 20commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines,   HB4210- 14 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 10Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 11utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 12diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 13purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 14of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 15lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 16Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 19in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 20in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 21the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 22the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 23at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 24collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 25that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 26this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the   HB4210- 15 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 2collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 3have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 4lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 5for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 6Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90.8    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 10who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 12subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 13that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 17any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 18tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 19case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 20the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 21or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB4210- 16 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90.5    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 6the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 7with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 8are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 9Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 10July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 11of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 13subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 14Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 15are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 162005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 17added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 18that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 19the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 20Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 21commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 22property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 23enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 24    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   HB4210- 17 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.5    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 24complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   HB4210- 18 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 4this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 5personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 6complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 7hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 8approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 9Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 10operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 11Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 14meet the qualifications of item (A). 15    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 16commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 17service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 18129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 19this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 20existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 21exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 22January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 24the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 25and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26101-629).  HB4210- 19 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 2public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 4constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 5only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 6transferred to the municipality without any further 7consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 8of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 9retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 10instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 11connection with the development of the municipal convention 12hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 13corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15of Section 3-90. 16    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 19Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 20that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 21rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 22Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 23Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.25    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 26who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of   HB4210- 20 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-90.3    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 4construction or operation of a data center that has been 5granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 7personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 8tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 9of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 10have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 111, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 12obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 13equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 14supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 15purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 16qualified. 17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 18grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 19qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22    For the purposes of this item (40): 23        "Data center" means a building or a series of 24    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 25    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 26    the State of Illinois.   HB4210- 21 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 7    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 8    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 9    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 10    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 11    systems; other cabling; and other data center 12    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 13    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 14    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 15    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 16    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 17    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 18    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 19    personal property; and all other tangible personal 20    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 21    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 22    property" also includes building materials physically 23    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 24    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 25    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 26    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and   HB4210- 22 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-90. 4    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 6item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 7used in this item (41): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   HB4210- 23 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 21the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 22Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 3-90. 24    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26forces of the United States who presents valid military   HB4210- 24 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1identification and purchases the property using a form of 2payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 3of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 4prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 5transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 6paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 7the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 8years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 10Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90. 12    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 13to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 14intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 15Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 16Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 17(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 18    (45) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 19Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) is exempt 24from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (46) Use by the lessee of the following leased tangible 26personal property:  HB4210- 25 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 2    meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  HB4210- 26 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023. 10    (47) On and after January 1, 2027, essential supplies 11purchased by a day care center that has been granted a 12certificate of exemption by the Department. The Department of 13Children and Family Services may share information with the 14Department of Revenue for the purpose of administering the 15provisions of this exemption. This item (47) is exempt from 16the provisions of Section 3-90. 17    As used in this item (47): 18    "Day care center" has the meaning given to that term in 19Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 20    "Essential supplies" means items designated, by rule, as 21essential supplies by the Department of Children and Family 22Services, including, but not limited to: food and beverages to 23be consumed by a child as a snack or meal at the day care 24center, including, but not limited to, fruits and vegetables, 25whole grains, proteins, water, and reduced fat or skim milk; 26diapers; wipes; first aid kits; smoke detectors; nap mats; and   HB4210- 27 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1soap and hand sanitizer. 2(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 3103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 46-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 5eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 6103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 7    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 8Section 3-5 as follows: 9    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)10    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 11personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:12    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 13society, association, foundation, institution, or 14organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 15organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 16for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 17personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 18purpose of resale by the enterprise.19    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 20county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 21promoting the county fair.22    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 23or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 24by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption   HB4210- 28 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 2is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 3support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 4services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 5music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 6orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 7organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 8and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 9effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 10otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 11purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 12by the Department.13    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 14coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 15United States of America, or the government of any foreign 16country, and bullion.17    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 182004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 19equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 20and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 21purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 22primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 23chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 24chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 25immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 26July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included   HB4210- 29 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 2exemption under Section 2 of this Act.3    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 4student organization affiliated with an elementary or 5secondary school located in Illinois.6    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 7including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 8purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 9State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 10replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 11machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 12implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 13Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 14chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 15to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 16Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 17registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 18polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 19overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 20equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 21tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 22motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 23on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 24of the tender is separately stated.25    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 26farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be   HB4210- 30 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 2limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 3or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 4limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 5software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 6such equipment.7    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 8sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 9computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 10facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 11to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 12crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 13agricultural chemicals. 14    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 15also includes electrical power generation equipment used 16primarily for production agriculture. 17    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 183-75.19    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 20to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 21to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 22conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 23destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 24the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 25domestic stopovers.26    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold   HB4210- 31 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 2used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 3its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 4engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 5United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 6at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 7origination to the city of final destination on the same 8aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 9that aircraft. 10    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 11stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 12food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 13service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 14the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 15substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 16in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 17beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 18imposed.19    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 20and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 21rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 22pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 23(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 24lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 25exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 26machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding   HB4210- 32 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 2Vehicle Code.3    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 4and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 5new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 6certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 7photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 8equipment purchased for lease.9    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 10mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 11reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 12equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 13excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 14Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 15Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 16for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 17(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 18during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1916, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).20    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 21for direct agricultural production.22    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 23meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 24Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 25Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 26Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or   HB4210- 33 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 2provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 3under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 41995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 5January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 6such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 7ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 895-88).9    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 10any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 11analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 12lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 13longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 14otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 15hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 16identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 17the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 18in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 19in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 20the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 21may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 22time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 23attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 24purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 25Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 26been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any   HB4210- 34 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 2right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 3however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 4reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 5Department.6    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 7the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 8in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 9the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 10been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 11the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 12Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 13qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 14manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 15this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 16fair market value of the property at the time the 17non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 18to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 19reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 20Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 21by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 22from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 23refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 24amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 25is liable to pay that amount to the Department.26    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after   HB4210- 35 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 2before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 3for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 4disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 5manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 6corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 7that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 8number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 9who reside within the declared disaster area.10    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 11December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 12before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 13the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 14including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 15access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 16water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 17purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 18facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 19State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 20Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 21in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 22disaster.23    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 24at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 25used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 26provisions of Section 3-75.  HB4210- 36 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 21-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 3corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 4foundation, or institution that is determined by the 5Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 6educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 9for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 10schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 11useful branches of learning by methods common to public 12schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 13intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 14schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 15organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 16study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 17individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 18technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 19occupation.20    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 21including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 22benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 23a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 24the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 25district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 26parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph   HB4210- 37 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 2private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 3entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 4another individual or entity that sold the property for the 5purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 6from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 7exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.8    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 92001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 10serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 11other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 12Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 13and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 14amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 15paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 16commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 17paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.18    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 19food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 20premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 21soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 22consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 23drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 24materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 25use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 26assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who   HB4210- 38 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 2the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 3in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 4Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.5    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 6Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 7utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 8diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 9purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 10of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 11lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 12Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 13identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 14the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 15in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 16in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 17the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 18may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 19time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 20attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 21purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 22Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 23been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 24such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 25right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 26however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any   HB4210- 39 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 2Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3Section 3-75.4    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 5Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 6who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 7executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 8subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 9that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 10number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 11Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 12does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 13nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 14imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 15based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 16nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 17to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 18reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 19Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 20by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 21from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 22refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 23amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 24is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 25is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.26    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property   HB4210- 40 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 2supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 3Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 4corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 5under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 6paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 7    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 8December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 9and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 10of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 11repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 12includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 13refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 14maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 15exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 16components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 17replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 18power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 19installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 20supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 21sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 22latex gloves, and protective films. 23    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2431, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 25tangible personal property transferred incident to the 26modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair,   HB4210- 41 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 2Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 3repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 4have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 5accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 6From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 7applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 8property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 9refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 10of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 11Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 12station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 13Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 14with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 15modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 16engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 17persons meet the qualifications of item (A).18    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 19commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 20service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 21129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 22this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 23existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 24exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 25January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 26for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of   HB4210- 42 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 2and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 3101-629).4    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 5public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 611-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 7constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 8only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 9transferred to the municipality without any further 10consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 11of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 12retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 13instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 14connection with the development of the municipal convention 15hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 16corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 17Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 18of Section 3-75. 19    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 202026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 21    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 22who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 23federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 24Section 3-75. 25    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 26construction or operation of a data center that has been   HB4210- 43 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 3personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 4tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 5of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 6have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 71, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 8obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 9equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 10supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 11purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 12qualified. 13    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 14grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 15qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 16Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 17Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 18    For the purposes of this item (31): 19        "Data center" means a building or a series of 20    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 21    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 22    the State of Illinois. 23        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 24    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 25    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 26    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency   HB4210- 44 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 2    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 3    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 4    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 5    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 6    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 7    systems; other cabling; and other data center 8    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 9    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 10    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 11    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 12    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 13    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 14    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 15    personal property; and all other tangible personal 16    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 17    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 18    property" also includes building materials physically 19    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 20    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 21    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 22    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 23    Economic Opportunity. 24    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 253-75. 26    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump   HB4210- 45 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 2item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 3used in this item (32): 4        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 5    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 6    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 7    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 8    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 9    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 10    time of sale. 11        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 12    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 13    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 14    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 15    milk until it is ready for consumption. 16        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 17    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 18    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 19    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 20    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 21    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 22    milk storage bags. 23        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 24    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 25    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 26    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice   HB4210- 46 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 2    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 3    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 4    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 5    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 6    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 7    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 8    or distributor. 9        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 10    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 11    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 12    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 13    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 14    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 15    manufacturer or distributor. 16    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 17the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 18Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 19Section 3-75. 20    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 21property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 22forces of the United States who presents valid military 23identification and purchases the property using a form of 24payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 25of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 26prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the   HB4210- 47 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 2paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 3the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 4years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 5States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 6Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-75. 8    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 9to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 10intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 11Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 12Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 13paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 14    (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 15Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 16transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 17or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 18the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 19Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 20Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 21Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 22an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 23Facilities Act. This item (36) is exempt from the provisions 24of Section 3-75. 25    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 26Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be   HB4210- 48 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 2alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 3use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 4prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) is exempt 5from the provisions of Section 3-75. 6    (38) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 7personal property:8        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 9    meets the following requirements:10            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 11        by the licensor and the customer;12                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 13            customer accepts the license by means of an 14            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 15            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 16            the license will comply with this requirement;17                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 18            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 19            agree" does not comply with this requirement;20            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 21        use of the software;22            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 23        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 24        party (except to a related party) without the 25        permission and continued control of the licensor;26            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another   HB4210- 49 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 2        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 3        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 4        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 5        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 6        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 7        the licensor; and8            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 9        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 10        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 11        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 12        forth in the license agreement; and13        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 14    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 15    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 16    January 1, 2023. 17    (39) On and after January 1, 2027, essential supplies 18purchased by a day care center that has been granted a 19certificate of exemption by the Department. The Department of 20Children and Family Services may share information with the 21Department of Revenue for the purpose of administering the 22provisions of this exemption. This item (39) is exempt from 23the provisions of Section 3-75. 24    As used in this item (39): 25    "Day care center" has the meaning given to that term in 26Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969.   HB4210- 50 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    "Essential supplies" means items designated, by rule, as 2essential supplies by the Department of Children and Family 3Services, including, but not limited to: food and beverages to 4be consumed by a child as a snack or meal at the day care 5center, including, but not limited to, fruits and vegetables, 6whole grains, proteins, water, and reduced fat or skim milk; 7diapers; wipes; first aid kits; smoke detectors; nap mats; and 8soap and hand sanitizer. 9(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 10103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 12eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 148-15-25.) 15    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 16changing Section 3-5 as follows: 17    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)18    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 19property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:20    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 21association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 22than a limited liability company, that is organized and 23operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 24benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal   HB4210- 51 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 2of resale by the enterprise.3    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 4Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 5operating, or promoting the county fair.6    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 7or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 8by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 9under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 10is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 11support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 12services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 13music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 14orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 15organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 16and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 17effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 18otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 19purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 20by the Department.21    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 22coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 23United States of America, or the government of any foreign 24country, and bullion.25    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 262004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and   HB4210- 52 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 2and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 3purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 4primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 5chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 6chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 7immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 8July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 9in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 10exemption under Section 2 of this Act.11    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 12organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 13located in Illinois.14    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 15including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 16purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 17State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 18replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 19machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 20implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 21Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 22chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 23to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 24Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 25registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 26polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or   HB4210- 53 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 2equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 3tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 4motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 5on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 6of the tender is separately stated.7    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 8farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 9installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 10limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 11or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 12limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 13software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 14such equipment.15    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 16sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 17computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 18facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 19to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 20crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 21agricultural chemicals. 22    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 23also includes electrical power generation equipment used 24primarily for production agriculture. 25    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 263-55.  HB4210- 54 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 2to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 3to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 4conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 5destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 6the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 7domestic stopovers.8    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 9to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 10used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 11its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 12engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 13United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 14at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 15origination to the city of final destination on the same 16aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 17that aircraft. 18    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 19stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 20food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 21service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 22substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 23in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 24beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 25imposed.26    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling,   HB4210- 55 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 2rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 3pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 4(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 5lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 6exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 8motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 9Vehicle Code.10    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 11repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 12that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 13to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 14photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.15    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 16mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 17reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 18equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 19excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 20Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 21Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 22for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 23(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 24during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2516, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).26    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016,   HB4210- 56 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 2premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 3soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 4consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 5drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 6materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 7use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 8assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 9resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 10the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 11in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 12Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.13    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 14for direct agricultural production.15    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 16meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 17Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 18Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 19Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 20racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 21provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 22under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 231995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 24January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 25such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 26ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act   HB4210- 57 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b195-88).2    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 3any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 4analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 5who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 6executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 7hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 8identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 9the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.10    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 11property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 12effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 13has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 14by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act.16    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 17December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 18before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 19for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 20disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 21manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 22corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 23that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 24number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 25who reside within the declared disaster area.26    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after   HB4210- 58 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 2before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 3the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 4including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 5access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 6water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 7purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 8facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 9State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 10Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 11in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 12disaster.13    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 14"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 15in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 16provisions of Section 3-55.17    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 181-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 19corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 20foundation, or institution that is determined by the 21Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 22educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 23corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 24foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 25for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 26schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in   HB4210- 59 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1useful branches of learning by methods common to public 2schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 3intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 4schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 5organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 6study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 7individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 8technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 9occupation.10    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 11including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 12benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 13a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 14the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 15district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 16parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 17does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 18private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 19entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 20another individual or entity that sold the property for the 21purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 22from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 23exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.24    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 252001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 26serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and   HB4210- 60 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 2Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 3and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 4amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 5paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 6commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 7paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.8    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 10utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 11diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 12a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 13longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 14hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 15identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 16the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 17from the provisions of Section 3-55.18    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 19Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 20leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 21executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 22governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 23identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 24the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 25from the provisions of Section 3-55.26    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30,   HB4210- 61 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b12016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 2retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 3activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 4in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 5for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 6State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 7State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 8or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 9tangible personal property to be transported outside this 10State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 11State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 12adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 13Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 14with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 15this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 16(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 17manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 18purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 19from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 20all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 21consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 22the State of Illinois.23    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 24used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 25supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 26Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit   HB4210- 62 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 2under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 3paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 4    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 5public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 611-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 7constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 8only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 9transferred to the municipality without any further 10consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 11of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 12retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 13instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 14connection with the development of the municipal convention 15hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 16corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 17Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 18of Section 3-55. 19    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 20December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 21and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 22of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 23repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 24includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 25refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 26maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this   HB4210- 63 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 2components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 3replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 4power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 5installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 6supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 7sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 8latex gloves, and protective films. 9    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1031, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 11qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 12modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 13or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 14Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 15repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 16have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 17accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 18The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 19commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 20service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 21129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 22through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 23transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 24(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 25replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 26hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an   HB4210- 64 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 2Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 3operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 4Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 5and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 6regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 7of item (A).8    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 998-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 10General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 11applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 122024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 13taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 14or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 15effective date of Public Act 101-629).16    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 19who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 20paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 21    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 22construction or operation of a data center that has been 23granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 24Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 25personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 26tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor   HB4210- 65 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 2have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 31, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 4obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 5equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 6supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 7purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 8qualified. 9    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 10grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 11qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 12Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 13Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 14    For the purposes of this item (32): 15        "Data center" means a building or a series of 16    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 17    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 18    the State of Illinois. 19        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 20    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 21    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 22    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 23    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 24    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 25    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 26    systems; peripheral components or systems; software;   HB4210- 66 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 2    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 3    systems; other cabling; and other data center 4    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 5    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 6    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 7    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 8    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 9    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 10    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 11    personal property; and all other tangible personal 12    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 13    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 14    property" also includes building materials physically 15    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 16    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 17    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 18    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 19    Economic Opportunity. 20    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 213-55. 22    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 23collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 24item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 25used in this item (33): 26        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or   HB4210- 67 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 2    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 3    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 4    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 5    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 6    time of sale. 7        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 8    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 9    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 10    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 11    milk until it is ready for consumption. 12        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 13    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 14    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 15    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 16    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 17    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 18    milk storage bags. 19        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 20    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 21    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 22    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 23    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 24    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 25    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 26    ointments, and other similar products that relieve   HB4210- 68 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 2    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 3    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 4    or distributor. 5        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 6    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 7    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 8    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 9    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 10    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 11    manufacturer or distributor. 12    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 13the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 14Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 15Section 3-55.16    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 17property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 18forces of the United States who presents valid military 19identification and purchases the property using a form of 20payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 21of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 22prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 23transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 24paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 25the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 26years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United   HB4210- 69 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 2Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3Section 3-55. 4    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 5to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 6intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 7Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 8Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 9paragraph (36) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 10    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 11Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 12transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 13or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 14Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 15Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 16Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 17Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 18an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 19Facilities Act. This item (37) is exempt from the provisions 20of Section 3-55. 21    (38) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 22Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 23consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 24alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 25use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 26prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) is exempt   HB4210- 70 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1from the provisions of Section 3-55. 2    (39) The lease of the following tangible personal 3property:4        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 5    that meets the following requirements:6            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 7        by the licensor and the customer;8                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 9            customer accepts the license by means of an 10            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 11            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 12            the license will comply with this requirement;13                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 14            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 15            agree" does not comply with this requirement;16            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 17        use of the software;18            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 19        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 20        party (except to a related party) without the 21        permission and continued control of the licensor;22            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 23        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 24        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 25        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 26        either stated in the license agreement, supported by   HB4210- 71 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 2        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 3        the licensor; and4            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 5        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 6        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 7        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 8        forth in the license agreement; and9        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 10    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 11    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 12    January 1, 2023. 13    (40) On and after January 1, 2027, essential supplies 14purchased by a day care center that has been granted a 15certificate of exemption by the Department. The Department of 16Children and Family Services may share information with the 17Department of Revenue for the purpose of administering the 18provisions of this exemption. This item (40) is exempt from 19the provisions of Section 3-55. 20    As used in this item (40): 21    "Day care center" has the meaning given to that term in 22Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 23    "Essential supplies" means items designated, by rule, as 24essential supplies by the Department of Children and Family 25Services, including, but not limited to: food and beverages to 26be consumed by a child as a snack or meal at the day care   HB4210- 72 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1center, including, but not limited to, fruits and vegetables, 2whole grains, proteins, water, and reduced fat or skim milk; 3diapers; wipes; first aid kits; smoke detectors; nap mats; and 4soap and hand sanitizer. 5(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 6103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 76-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 8eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 108-15-25.) 11    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 12by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)14    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 15the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 16lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 17from the tax imposed by this Act:18        (1) Farm chemicals.19        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 20    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 21    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 22    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 23    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 24    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased   HB4210- 73 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 2    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 3    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 4    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 5    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 6    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 7    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 8    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 9    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 10    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 11    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 12    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 13    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 14    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 15    stated.16        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 17    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 18    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 19    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 20    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 21    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 22    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 23    mapping systems, and other such equipment.24        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 25    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 26    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture   HB4210- 74 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 2    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 3    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 4    diets and agricultural chemicals. 5        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 6    equipment also includes electrical power generation 7    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 8        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 9    2-70.10        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 11    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 12    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 13    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 14    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 15    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 16    or resale.17        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 18    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 19    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 20    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 21    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 22    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 23    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 24    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 25    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 26    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017,   HB4210- 75 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 2    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 3    exemption under paragraph (14).4        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 5    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 6    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 7    provisions of Section 2-70.8        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 9    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 10    secondary school located in Illinois.11        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 12    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 13    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.14        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 15    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 16    the county fair.17        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 18    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 19    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 20    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 21    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 22    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 23    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 24    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 25    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 26    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils,   HB4210- 76 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 2    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 3    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 4    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 5    an active identification number issued by the Department.6        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 7    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 8    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 9    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 10    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 11    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 12    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.13        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 14    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 15    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 16    institution organized and operated exclusively for 17    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 18    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 19    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 20    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 21    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 22    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 23    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 24    limited liability company is organized and operated 25    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 26    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this   HB4210- 77 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 2    active identification number issued by the Department.3        (12) (Blank).4        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 5    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 6    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 7    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 8    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 9    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 10    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 11    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 12    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 13    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 14    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 15    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 16    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 17    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 18    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 19    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 20    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 21    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 22    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 23    or not. 24        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 25    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 26    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as   HB4210- 78 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 2    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 3    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 4    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 5    moving in interstate commerce.6        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 7    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 8    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 9    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 10    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 11    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 12    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 13    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 14    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 15    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 16    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 17    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 18    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 19    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 20    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 21    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 22    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 23    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 24    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 25    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 26    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of   HB4210- 79 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 2    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 3    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 4    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 5    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.6        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 8    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 9    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 10    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 11    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 12    food or beverage function with respect to which the 13    service charge is imposed. 14        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 15    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 16    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 17    of Section 2-70. 18        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 19    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 20    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 21    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 22    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 23    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 24    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 25    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.26        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or   HB4210- 80 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 2    government of the United States of America, or the 3    government of any foreign country, and bullion.4        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 5    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 6    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 7    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 8    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 9    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 10    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 11    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 12    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 13    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.14        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 15    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 16    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 17    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 18    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 19    purchased for lease.20        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 21    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 22    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 23    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 24    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 25    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 26    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on   HB4210- 81 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 2    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 3    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 4    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 5    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).6        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 7    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 8    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 9    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 10    flight destined for or returning from a location or 11    locations outside the United States without regard to 12    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.13        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 14    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 15    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 16    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 17    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 18    in trade between the United States and any of its 19    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 20    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 21    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 22    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 23        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 24    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 25    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 26    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.  HB4210- 82 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 2    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 3    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 4    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 5    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 6    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.7        (25) Except as provided in items (25-5) and (25-6) of 8    this Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 9    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 10    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 11    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 12    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 13    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 14    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 15    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 16    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 17    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 18    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 19    titled in this State.20        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 21    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 22    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 23    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 24    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 25    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 26    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption   HB4210- 83 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 2    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 3    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 4    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 5    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 6    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 7    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 8    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 9    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 10    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 11    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 12    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 13    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 14    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 15    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 16    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 17    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 18    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 19    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 20    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 21    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 22    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 23    general rate imposed under this Act. 24        (25-6) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 25    exemption under item (25) does not apply if the purchaser 26    is a limited liability company and a member of the limited   HB4210- 84 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    liability company is a resident of Illinois. This 2    presumption may be rebutted by other evidence, such as 3    evidence the motor vehicle is insured at a garaging or 4    storage address outside Illinois or other evidence of the 5    physical address at which the motor vehicle will be 6    permanently stored or garaged outside Illinois. 7        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 8    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 9    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 10    following conditions are met:11            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 12        after the later of either the issuance of the final 13        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 14        authorized approval for return to service, completion 15        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 16        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 17        required by 14 CFR 91.407;18            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 19        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and20            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 21        records and provides to the Department a signed and 22        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 23        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 24        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 25        certificate must also include the name and address of 26        the purchaser, the address of the location where the   HB4210- 85 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 2        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 3        other information that the Department may reasonably 4        require.5        For purposes of this item (25-7):6        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 7    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 8    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 9    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 10    of the aircraft.11        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 12    registered with the Department of Transportation, 13    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 14    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 15    this State.16        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 17    Section 2-70. 18        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 19    livestock for direct agricultural production.20        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 21    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 22    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 23    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 24    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 25    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 26    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the   HB4210- 86 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 2    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 3    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 4    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 5    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 6    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 7    95-88).8        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 9    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 10    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 11    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 12    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 13    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 14    exemption identification number by the Department under 15    Section 1g of this Act.16        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 17    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 18    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 19    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 20    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 21    of this Act.22        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 23    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 24    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 25    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 26    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering   HB4210- 87 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 2    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 3    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 4    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 5    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 6    declared disaster area.7        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 8    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 9    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 10    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 11    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 12    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 13    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 14    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 15    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 16    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 17    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 18    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 19    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.20        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 21    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 22    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 23    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.24        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 25    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 26    donated to a corporation, limited liability company,   HB4210- 88 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 2    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 3    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 4    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 5    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 6    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 7    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 8    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 9    learning by methods common to public schools and that 10    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 11    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 12    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 13    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 14    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 15    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 16    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 17    occupation.18        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 19    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 20    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 21    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 22    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 23    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 24    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 25    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 26    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home   HB4210- 89 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 2    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 3    another individual or entity that sold the property for 4    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 5    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 6    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.7        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 8    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 9    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 10    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 11    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 12    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 13    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 14    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 15    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 16    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 17    from the provisions of Section 2-70.18        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 19    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 20    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 21    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 22    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 23    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 24    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 25    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 26    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V   HB4210- 90 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 2    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 3    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 4    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 5    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.6        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 7    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 8    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 9    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 10    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 11    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 12    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 13    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 14    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15    of Section 2-70.16        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 17    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 18    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 19    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 20    active tax exemption identification number by the 21    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 22    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.23        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 24    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 25    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 26    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt   HB4210- 91 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 2    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 3    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 4    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 5    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 6    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 7    personal property to be transported outside this State and 8    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 9    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 10    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 11    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 12    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 13    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 14    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 15    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 16    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 17    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 18    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 19    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 20    property outside of the State of Illinois.21        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 22    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 23    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 24    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 25    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 26    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental   HB4210- 92 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 2    provisions of Section 2-70. 3        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 4    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 5    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 6    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 7    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 8    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 9    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 10    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 11    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 12    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 13    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 14    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 15    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 16    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 17    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 18    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 19    latex gloves, and protective films. 20        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 21    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 22    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 23    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 24    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 25    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 26    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV   HB4210- 93 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 2    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 3    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 4    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 5    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 6    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 7    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 8    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 9    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 10    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 11    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 12    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 13    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 14    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 15    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 16    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 17    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 18    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 19    item (A).20        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 21    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 22    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 23    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 24    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 25    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 26    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015   HB4210- 94 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 2    Public Act 101-629).3        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 4    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 5    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 6    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 7    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 8    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 9    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 10    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 11    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 12    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 13    corporation in connection with the development of the 14    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 15    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 16    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 17    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 18        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 19    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 20        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 21    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 22    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 23    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 24    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 25    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 26    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from   HB4210- 95 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    the provisions of Section 2-70.2        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 3    construction or operation of a data center that has been 4    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 5    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 6    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 7    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 8    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 9    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 10    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 11    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 12    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 13    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 14    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 15    or leased in the original investment that would have 16    qualified. 17        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 18    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 19    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 20    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 21    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 22    Illinois. 23        For the purposes of this item (44): 24            "Data center" means a building or a series of 25        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 26        working servers in one physical location or multiple   HB4210- 96 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        sites within the State of Illinois. 2            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 3        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 4        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 5        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 6        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 7        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 8        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 9        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 10        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 11        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 12        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 13        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 14        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 15        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 16        any of the foregoing, including installation, 17        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 18        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 19        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 20        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 21        property; and all other tangible personal property 22        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 23        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 24        property" also includes building materials physically 25        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 26        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the   HB4210- 97 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 2        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 3        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 4        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 5    Section 2-70. 6        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 7    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 8    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 9    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 10    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 11    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 12    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 13    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 14    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 15    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 16    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 17    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 18    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 19    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 20    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 21    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 22    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 23        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 24    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 25    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 26    2-70. As used in this item (46):   HB4210- 98 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 2    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 3    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 4    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 5    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 6    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 7    time of sale. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 9    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 10    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 11    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 12    milk until it is ready for consumption. 13        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 14    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 15    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 16    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 17    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 18    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 19    milk storage bags. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 21    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 22    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 23    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 24    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 25    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 26    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams,   HB4210- 99 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 2    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 3    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 4    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 5    or distributor. 6        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 7    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 8    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 9    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 10    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 11    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 12    manufacturer or distributor. 13        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 14    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 15    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 16    provisions of Section 2-70. 17        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 18    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 19    forces of the United States who presents valid military 20    identification and purchases the property using a form of 21    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 22    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 23    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 24    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 25    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 26    form as documentation of the exemption in their records   HB4210- 100 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 2    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 3    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 4    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 5        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 6    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 7    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 8    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 9    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 10    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 11    the provisions of Section 2-70. 12        (50) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 13    in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that is to be 14    consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 15    alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 16    adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has 17    been prepared for immediate consumption). This item (50) 18    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 19        (51) Gross receipts from the lease of the following 20    tangible personal property:21            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 22        license that meets the following requirements:23                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 24            signed by the licensor and the customer;25                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 26                customer accepts the license by means of an   HB4210- 101 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1                electronic signature that is verifiable and 2                can be authenticated and is attached to or 3                made part of the license will comply with this 4                requirement;5                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 6                customer electronically accepts the terms by 7                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 8                requirement;9                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 10            and use of the software;11                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 12            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 13            third party (except to a related party) without 14            the permission and continued control of the 15            licensor;16                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 17            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 18            customer loses or damages the software, or of 19            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 20            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 21            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 22            books and records, or supported by a notarized 23            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 24            licensor; and25                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 26            copies of the software to the licensor at the end   HB4210- 102 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 2            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 3            without being set forth in the license agreement; 4            and5            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 6        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 7        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 8        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 9        (52) On and after January 1, 2027, essential supplies 10    purchased by a day care center that has been granted a 11    certificate of exemption by the Department. The Department 12    of Children and Family Services may share information with 13    the Department of Revenue for the purpose of administering 14    the provisions of this exemption. This item (52) is exempt 15    from the provisions of Section 2-70. 16        As used in this item (52): 17        "Day care center" has the meaning given to that term 18    in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 19        "Essential supplies" means items designated, by rule, 20    as essential supplies by the Department of Children and 21    Family Services, including, but not limited to: food and 22    beverages to be consumed by a child as a snack or meal at 23    the day care center, including, but not limited to, fruits 24    and vegetables, whole grains, proteins, water, and reduced 25    fat or skim milk; diapers; wipes; first aid kits; smoke 26    detectors; nap mats; and soap and hand sanitizer.   HB4210- 103 -LRB104 16235 HLH 29619 b1(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-20, eff. 6-7-23; 2103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 36-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 4eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-6, eff. 66-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.